Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 168.013, subdivision 1m, is amended to read: Subd. 1m. Electric vehicle. (a) A surcharge deleted text begin as provided in paragraph (b) or (c)deleted text end new text begin of $100new text end is imposed for an all-electric vehicle, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 1a. The surcharge is in addition to the tax under subdivision 1a. deleted text begin (b) The surcharge is calculated as the greater of the minimum amount specified in paragraph (c) or: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) 0.5 percent of the manufacturer's suggested retail price, as determined under subdivision 1a, paragraph (c); multiplied by deleted text end deleted text begin (2) the percentage specified under subdivision 1a, paragraph (e), clauses (1) to (10), for the vehicle's year of life, or ten percent for a vehicle in its 11th and each succeeding year of life. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) The minimum amount is: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) $150 for a registration period beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and on or before June 30, 2027; or deleted text end deleted text begin (2) $100 for a registration period beginning on or after July 1, 2027. deleted text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end Notwithstanding subdivision 8, revenue collected under this subdivision must be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to taxes payable for a registration period starting on or after January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 168.013, subdivision 1n, is amended to read: Subd. 1n. Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle. (a) A surcharge deleted text begin as provided in paragraph (b) or (c)deleted text end new text begin of $50new text end is imposed for a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 54a. The surcharge is in addition to the tax under subdivision 1a. deleted text begin (b) The surcharge is calculated as the greater of the minimum amount specified under paragraph (c) or: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) 0.25 percent of the manufacturer's suggested retail price, as determined under subdivision 1a, paragraph (c); multiplied by deleted text end deleted text begin (2) the percentage specified under subdivision 1a, paragraph (e), clauses (1) to (10), for the vehicle's year of life, or ten percent for a vehicle in its 11th and each succeeding year of life. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) The minimum amount is: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) $75 for a registration period beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and on or before June 30, 2027; or deleted text end deleted text begin (2) $50 for a registration period beginning on or after July 1, 2027. deleted text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end Notwithstanding subdivision 8, revenue collected under this subdivision must be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to taxes payable for a registration period starting on or after January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.013, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1o. new text end new text begin Vehicle weight surcharge. new text end new text begin (a) A weight surcharge is imposed on a passenger automobile, as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 24, calculated as follows: new text end new text begin (1) for a weight rating of less than 5,000 pounds, $0; new text end new text begin (2) for a weight rating of 5,000 to 5,999 pounds, seven percent of the tax imposed under subdivision 1a; and new text end new text begin (3) for a weight rating of 6,000 pounds or more, ten percent of the tax imposed under subdivision 1a. new text end new text begin (b) The surcharge is in addition to the tax under subdivision 1a. The commissioner must determine the weight rating from the gross vehicle weight rating of the vehicle, as indicated on the manufacturer's certification label. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding subdivision 8, revenue collected under this subdivision must be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to taxes payable for a registration period starting on or after January 1, 2027. new text end